Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-187.01
Physical inspection, defined.

Physical inspection means an inspection for purposes of the Livestock Brand Act performed by an employee of the Nebraska Brand Committee physically present at the location of the inspected animals to verify ownership through visual observation of brands or other distinguishing markings and physical characteristics of the livestock and examination of any associated documentary or other evidence of ownership.

Laws 2021, LB572, § 8.
August 28, 2021